District of Columbia statutes.
3-1204.11

Annual report.

Each board shall, before January 1 of each year, submit a report to the Mayor and the Council of its official acts during the preceding fiscal year.

History

Mar. 25, 1986, D.C. Law 6-99, § 411, 33 DCR 729

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 2-3304.11.